Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-1736
Handicapped or disabled persons; designation of parking spaces.

(1) A city or village may designate parking spaces, including access aisles, for the exclusive use of (a) handicapped or disabled persons whose motor vehicles display the distinguishing license plates issued to handicapped or disabled persons pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, (b) handicapped or disabled persons whose motor vehicles display a distinguishing license plate issued to a handicapped or disabled person by another state, (c) such other handicapped or disabled persons or temporarily handicapped or disabled persons whose motor vehicles display a handicapped or disabled parking permit, and (d) such other motor vehicles which display a handicapped or disabled parking permit.

(2) If a city or village so designates a parking space or access aisle, it shall be indicated by posting aboveground and immediately adjacent to and visible from each space or access aisle a sign as described in section 18-1737. In addition to such sign, the space or access aisle may also be indicated by blue paint on the curb or edge of the paved portion of the street adjacent to the space or access aisle.

(3) For purposes of sections 18-1736 to 18-1741.07:

(a) Access aisle has the same meaning as in section 60-302.01;

(b) Handicapped or disabled parking permit has the same meaning as in section 60-331.01;

(c) Handicapped or disabled person has the same meaning as in section 60-331.02; and

(d) Temporarily handicapped or disabled person has the same meaning as in section 60-352.01.

Laws 1977, LB 13, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 146, § 1;

Laws 1980, LB 717, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 482, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 598, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 593, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1211, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 299, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 809, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 225;

Laws 2011, LB163, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB657, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB972, § 34.
July 18, 2026
Motor Vehicle Registration Act, see section 60-301.